Wisconsin, session 2025, AB641.
do enact as follows:AB641,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB641,28Section 2. 20.855 (4) (bg) of the statutes is created to read:AB641,2,12920.855 (4) (bg) Missing-in-Action Recovery Project. As a continuing 10appropriation, the amounts in the schedule for the Board of Regents of the 11University of Wisconsin System to provide the funding under 2025 Wisconsin Act 12.... (this act), section 3 (1).AB641,313Section 3. Nonstatutory provisions.AB641,2,1514(1) Funding for the University of Wisconsin Missing-in-Action 15Recovery and Identification Project.AB641,2,1616(a) In this subsection:AB641,2,17171. “Board” means the Board of Regents of the University of Wisconsin System.AB641,2,19182. “MIA Recovery Project” means the University of Wisconsin Missing-in-19Action Recovery and Identification Project.AB641,2,2320(b) From the appropriation under s. 20.855 (4) (bg), the board shall provide 21$500,000 in funding in each fiscal year of the 2025-27 fiscal biennium for the MIA 22Recovery Project to perform a mission for the recovery and identification of 23Wisconsin veterans who are missing in action.AB641,3,61(c) The MIA Recovery Project, acting through its representative, shall submit 2at the conclusion of the mission for which the funds were expended, to the board, 3the joint committee on finance, the standing committees of each house of the 4legislature dealing with veterans matters, the governor, the department of veterans 5affairs, and the department of military affairs, a report on the mission’s findings 6and an accounting of expenditures for the mission.AB641,3,77